Massachusetts, session 194th, H3162.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “person”, in line 957, the following words:— “or the
blind person’s surviving spouse until the surviving spouse remarries”
of 1